District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19f

Rulemaking for Registry.

The Mayor may issue rules necessary to implement the provisions of §§ 7-1531.19 through 7-1531.19e.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20f, 55 DCR 2532

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.19b.